Utah statutes.
9-8-304.   Antiquities Section created -- Duties.

(1)  There is created within the division the Antiquities Section.

(2)  The Antiquities Section shall:

(a)  promote research, study, and activities in the field of antiquities;

(b)  assist with the marking, protection, and preservation of sites;

(c)  assist with the collection, preservation, and administration of specimens until the specimens are placed in a repository or curation facility;

(d)  provide advice on the protection and orderly development of archaeological resources, and in doing so confer with the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office if requested;

(e)  assist with the excavation, retrieval, and proper care of ancient human remains discovered on nonfederal lands in accordance with:

(i)  Section 9-8-309;

(ii)  Section 9-9-403;

(iii)  Subsection 76-9-704(3); and

(iv)  federal law;

(f)  collect and administer site survey and excavation records;

(g)  edit and publish antiquities records;

(h)  inform the state historic preservation officer in writing about any request for advice or consultation from an agency or an agency's agent; and

(i)  employ an archaeologist meeting the requirements of 36 C.F.R. 61.4.

(3)  The Antiquities Section shall cooperate with local, state, and federal agencies and all interested persons to achieve the purposes of this part and Part 4, Historic Sites.

(4)  Before performing the duties specified in Subsections (2)(a) through (e), the Antiquities Section shall obtain permission from the landowner.



Amended by Chapter 231, 2007 General Session

